Maryland, session 2026, HB1243.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Tax – Property
1–101.
(a) In this article the following words have the meanings indicated.
(r) (1) “Manufacturing” means the process of substantially transforming, or a
substantial step in the process of substantially transforming, tangible personal property
into a new and different article of tangible personal property by use of labor or machinery.
(2) “Manufacturing” includes:
(i) the operation of sawmills, grain mills, or feed mills;
(ii) the operation of machinery and equipment used to extract and
process minerals, metals, or earthen materials or by–products that result from the
extracting or processing;
(iii) research and development activities, whether or not the company
has a product for sale;
(iv) the identification, design, or genetic engineering of biological
materials for research or manufacture; and
(v) the design, development, or creation of computer software for
sale, lease, or license.
(3) “Manufacturing” does not include:
(i) activities that are primarily a service;

HOUSE BILL 1243 3
(ii) activities that are intellectual, artistic, or clerical in nature;
(iii) public utility services, including telephone, gas, electric, water,
and steam production services; or
(iv) any other activity that would not commonly be considered as
manufacturing.
(dd) “Property tax” means the property tax imposed by:
(1) the State;
(2) a county; or
(3) a municipal corporation.
6–104.
Except as otherwise provided in §§ 7–222 [and], 7–226, AND 7–226.1 of this article,
any stock in business of a person who engages in a manufacturing or commercial business
in the State is subject to property tax.
7–109.
(a) [The] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN § 7–226.1 OF THIS TITLE, personal
property described in §§ 7–222, 7–225, and 7–226 of this title is subject to the municipal
corporation property tax unless exempted in full or in part by the governing body of the
municipal corporation by law.
7–222.
(a) Except as provided in § 7–109 of this title and in subsection (b) of this section,
the stock in business of a person engaged in a manufacturing or commercial business is not
subject to property tax.
7–225.
(a) Except as provided in § 7–109 of this title and in subsection (b) of this section,
if used in manufacturing, the following personal property, however operated and whether
or not in use, is not subject to property tax:
(1) tools;
(2) implements;
(3) machinery; or

HOUSE BILL 1243
(4) manufacturing apparatus or engines.
7–226.
Except as provided in § 7–109 of this title, raw materials and manufactured products
in the possession of a manufacturer are not subject to property tax.
7–226.1.
IN PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY, ALL PERSONAL PROPERTY, INCLUDING
MANUFACTURING INVENTORY, DESCRIBED IN §§ 7–222, 7–225, AND 7–226 OF THIS
SUBTITLE IN THE POSSESSION OF A PERSON ENGAGED IN A MANUFACTURING
BUSINESS THAT HOLDS AN ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES MANUFACTURER’S LICENSE
UNDER TITLE 2, SUBTITLE 2 OF THE ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES AND CANNABIS
ARTICLE AND HAS 50 OR FEWER EMPLOYEES IS EXEMPT FROM THE MUNICIPAL
CORPORATION PROPERTY TAX, INCLUDING ANY SPECIAL TAXING DISTRICT
PROPERTY TAX.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect June
1, 2026, and shall be applicable to all taxable years beginning after June 30, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.